District of Columbia statutes.
5-1031

Commencement of corrective or adverse action.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no corrective or adverse action against any sworn member or civilian employee of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department shall be commenced more than 90 days, not including Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays, after the date that the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department knew or should have known of the act or occurrence allegedly constituting cause.

(a-1)

(1)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no corrective or adverse action against any sworn member or civilian employee of the Metropolitan Police Department shall be commenced more than 90 days, not including Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays, after the date that the Metropolitan Police Department had notice of the act or occurrence allegedly constituting cause.

(2)

For the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Metropolitan Police Department has notice of the act or occurrence allegedly constituting cause on the date that the Metropolitan Police Department generates an internal investigation system tracking number for the act or occurrence.

(b)

If the act or occurrence allegedly constituting cause is the subject of a criminal investigation by the Metropolitan Police Department or any law enforcement agency with jurisdiction within the United States, the Office of the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia, or the Office of the Attorney General, or is the subject of an investigation by the Office of the Inspector General, the Office of the District of Columbia Auditor, or the Office of Police Complaints, the 90-day period for commencing a corrective or adverse action under subsection (a) or (a-1) of this section shall be tolled until the conclusion of the investigation.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 502, 51 DCR 9406
Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-173, § 101, 61 DCR 12582
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-173 deleted “or the Metropolitan Police Department” following “Medical Services Department” twice in (a); added (a-1); and rewrote (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101 of the Metropolitan Police Department Commencement of Discipline and Command Staff Appointment Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-524, Dec. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 13112, 20 STAT 4438).